Virginia statutes. Title 57. Religious and Charitable Matters; Cemeteries.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3B M.J. Cemeteries, §§ 2, 3, 4, 8.

§ 57-22.
Conveyance of land to trustees or local governing body for cemetery use.

Land may be conveyed to trustees, not less than five nor more than nine in number, for the use of any city, town, county, magisterial district, cemetery association, ecclesiastical or other society, as a cemetery. It shall be held by such trustees and their successors for such use and no other.

Land may also be conveyed to a county, city or town, in the name of the county, city or town, for use as a cemetery. Any perpetual care fund associated with the land or cemetery shall also be transferred upon such conveyance.

History.

Code 1919, § 50; 1997, c. 132.

The 1997 amendment

inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-205 Directions as to Burial.

§ 57-23.
Appointment, change or removal of trustees.

On the application of the governing body of a city or town, the attorney for the Commonwealth of a county, ten citizens of a magisterial district, or the proper authorities of any such association or society, for whose use such cemetery is held, the circuit court of the county in which the cemetery is situated may, from time to time, appoint, change, and remove the trustees, as provided in §

57-8

, whenever it may seem to the court proper to effect or promote the purposes of the trust.

History.

Code 1919, § 51.

§ 57-24.
Powers and duties of trustees.

Such trustees and their successors shall have power to make such rules and regulations for the burial of the dead, the laying off, assignment and sale of burial lots, and the management, care, preservation and improvement of the grounds, as they may deem proper. They may take and hold personal property and money for the purposes of the trust, and what is so acquired and all money received from the sale of lots shall be accounted for by them and faithfully applied to such purposes.

History.

Code 1919, § 52.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Application of fee schedules to burial plots. —

Because the purchaser’s burial space was an easement created prior to the church’s fee schedule, the fee schedule did not apply to the purchaser; as a result, the church had no duty to maintain or care for the space. Jordan v. Little Ark Baptist Church, 56 Va. Cir. 345, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 468 (King George County Aug. 16, 2001).

§ 57-24.1.
Trustee for purpose of suit.

In the case of any private or family graveyard, where no trustees have been designated, and it appears that the interest of justice may be served by the appointment of a trustee or trustees for the purpose of suing or being sued, on the petition of any interested party, the court of record wherein deeds are recorded of the county or city in which such cemetery is located, may appoint a trustee or trustees for the purpose of suing or being sued. The petitioner shall bear the expense of such proceedings, provided that in the event a recovery is effected on behalf of such trustee or trustees, costs shall be taxed as provided by law.

History.

1970, c. 94.

§ 57-25.
Condemnation of land for cemeteries.

If it is desired at any time to establish a cemetery for the use of a city, town, county or magisterial district, or to enlarge any such cemetery already established, and the title to land needed cannot be otherwise acquired, land sufficient for the purpose may be condemned. Application for the condemnation shall be made by the governing body of the city or town, the attorney for the Commonwealth of the county, or any ten citizens of the magisterial district, as the case may be, to the circuit court of the county or city in which the land lies, and the proceedings shall be according to the provisions of Title 25.1 for condemnation of land thereunder, so far as they can be applied to the case. The title to any land acquired under the proceedings, if for the enlargement of an existing cemetery, shall vest in the county, city or town, or in the trustees of such cemetery, as appropriate; and if for the establishment of a new cemetery, the title shall vest in the county, city or town, or in the trustees to be appointed under §

57-23

, as appropriate. The land shall be held as provided by §

57-22

.

History.

Code 1919, § 53; 1997, c. 132.

The 1997 amendment

substituted “is desired” for “be desired” in the first sentence; inserted “or city” preceding “in which the land lies” in the second sentence; in the third sentence, inserted “the county, city or town, or in” preceding “the trustees,” inserted “as appropriate” preceding “and if for the establishment,” inserted “the county, city or town, or in the” preceding “trustees to be appointed,” and inserted “as appropriate” following “§

57-23

”; and deleted “by the trustees and their successors” preceding “as provided by” in the last sentence.

§ 57-26.
Restrictions as to location of cemeteries and as to quantity of land.

Restrictions as to location. — No cemetery shall be hereafter established within a county or the corporate limits of any city or town, unless authorized by appropriate ordinance subject to any zoning ordinance duly adopted by the governing body of such county, city or town; provided that authorization by county ordinance shall not be required for interment of the dead in any churchyard or for interment of members of a family on private property; nor shall any cemetery be established within 250 yards of any residence without the consent of the owner of the legal and equitable title of the residence; provided that subject to the foregoing if the location for the proposed cemetery is separated from any residence by a state highway, it may be established upon such location without the consent of the owner of such residence if it be not less than 250´ from the residence at its nearest point thereto; provided such prohibition and restriction shall not apply where the tract of land intended for use as a cemetery is separated from any residence by a state highway and now contains a public or private burial ground and is not within the corporate limits of any city or town; and no cemetery shall be hereafter established, and no burial made in any part of any cemetery, other than a municipal or city cemetery, located within 300 yards of any property owned by any city, town or water company, upon which or a portion of which are now located driven wells from which water is pumped or drawn from the ground in connection with the public water supply.

Quantity of land. — Nothing contained in §§

57-22

to

57-25

shall be so construed as to authorize a conveyance of more than 300 acres or the condemnation of more than 2 acres of land for the use of a cemetery.

Action for damages. — When damage is done to adjacent land by the establishment of such cemetery, whether established by purchase or condemnation, the owners whose lands have been damaged shall have a right to action for such damage against any person, firm, corporation, or municipality, establishing the cemetery; provided such action be instituted within one year from such establishment.

Exceptions. — The prohibitions and restrictions as to the location or establishment of cemeteries shall not apply to the town of Stuart, in Patrick County, to the town of Gretna, in Pittsylvania County, to the town of Shenandoah in Page County, or to the Woodbine Cemetery in the city of Harrisonburg, Rockingham County. And if the location for the proposed cemetery be in Norfolk County it may be established on such location if consent thereto be given by the owners of every residence within 250´ thereof at its nearest point to any such residence, or if the location for the proposed cemetery is separated from any such residence by a state highway it may be established upon such location without the consent of the owner of such residence if it be not less than 150´ from the residence at its nearest point thereto.

History.

Code 1919, § 56; 1926, p. 866; 1934, p. 13; 1942, p. 102; 1944, p. 462; 1948, p. 492; 1952, c. 108; 1954, c. 10; 1960, c. 161; 1994, c. 229.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, c. 229, cl. 2, provided that the amendment to this section by Acts 1994, c. 229, cl. 1, would expire on July 1, 1999. The amendment redesignated subsections (1) through (4) as subsections A through D; and added language at the end of subsection (2). The section above is set out as it read prior to the 1994 amendment.

§ 57-27.
City of Richmond may prohibit burials in certain cemeteries.

The governing body of the City of Richmond may, by ordinance, prohibit the burial of dead bodies in the cemeteries known as Ham’s, Cedarwood, Methodist, Union Mechanics’, Ebenezer, and Sycamore cemeteries, respectively, and may by such ordinance provide for penalties for violations of the same by fine not exceeding fifty dollars, or imprisonment in jail not exceeding six months.

History.

Code 1919, § 57.

§ 57-27.1.
Access to cemeteries located on private property; cause of action for injunctive relief; applicability.

Owners of private property on which a cemetery or graves are located shall have a duty to allow ingress and egress to the cemetery or graves by (i) family members and descendants of deceased persons buried there; (ii) any cemetery plot owner; and (iii) any person engaging in genealogy research, who has given reasonable notice to the owner of record or to the occupant of the property or both. No landowner shall erect a wall, fence or other structure or device that prevents ingress and egress to the cemetery or grave, unless the wall, fence or other structure or device has a gate or other means by which ingress and egress can be accomplished by persons specified in this subsection. The landowner may designate the frequency of access, hours and duration of the access and the access route if no traditional access route is obviously visible by a view of the property. The landowner, in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, shall be immune from liability in any civil suit, claim, action, or cause of action arising out of the access granted pursuant to this section.

The right of ingress and egress granted to persons specified in subsection A shall be reasonable and limited to the purposes of visiting graves, maintaining the gravesite or cemetery, or conducting genealogy research. The right of ingress and egress shall not be construed to provide a right to operate motor vehicles on the property for the purpose of accessing a cemetery or gravesite unless there is a road or adequate right-of-way that permits access by a motor vehicle and the owner has given written permission to use the road or right-of-way of necessity.

Any person entering onto private property to access a gravesite or cemetery shall be responsible for conducting himself in a manner that does not damage the private lands, the cemetery or gravesites and shall be liable to the owner of the property for any damage caused as a result of his access.

Any person denied reasonable access under the provisions of this section may bring an action in the circuit court where the property is located to enjoin the owner of the property from denying the person reasonable ingress and egress to the cemetery or gravesite. In granting such relief, the court may (i) set the frequency of access, hours and duration of the access and (ii) award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the person denied such access.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any deed or other written instrument that creates or reserves a cemetery or gravesite on private property.

History.

1993, c. 713; 2004, c. 831; 2008, c. 390; 2011, c. 257.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 555, cl. 1, as amended by Acts 2006, cc. 105 and 180, provides: “§ 1. Buchanan County, Dickenson County, and Tazewell County may make appropriations in such sums and at such times as the governing body of the county deems proper, for maintenance of private roads that provide the sole access to private family cemeteries containing 10 or more graves. Appropriations shall be made for this purpose only when necessary to keep the roads passable by motor vehicle and only when such action is not in conflict with the provisions of §

57-27.1

.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 831 rewrote the section, which formerly read: “After reasonable notice to the property owner at his last known address, representatives of local historical commissions may enter upon the land of a private or family cemetery for the purpose of conducting official business, unless the property owner objects.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 390, in subsection D, inserted the clause (i) designation and added clause (ii) at the end.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 257 added the second sentence in subsection A.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Right to access. —

Statute did not give family members and descendants of deceased persons buried in a cemetery the right to cross two tracts of land; the cemetery access statute, given its plain meaning, obligates only owners of private property on which a cemetery or graves are located to allow ingress and egress to the cemetery, and there is nothing in the statute that would provide a similar obligation to owners of adjoining properties on which the cemetery or graves are not located. Wintergreen Homestead, LLC v. Pennington, 108 Va. Cir. 514, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 519 (Nelson County Oct. 12, 2021).

§ 57-27.2.
Correction of interment errors.

In any instance where the operator of a cemetery is informed or becomes aware that it has interred or permitted the interment of a body or cremains in the wrong burial space, it shall disinter the burial container wrongfully interred, identify the burial container, and reinter it in the proper burial space. The cemetery shall give reasonable notice, in advance of the disinterment, to the nearest known next of kin of the deceased person and, if requested, the owner of such burial space. For the purposes of this section, “interment” means the same as such term is defined in §

54.1-2310

.

At the time specified for the disinterment and reinterment, the cemetery shall permit the nearest known next of kin and, if requested, the owner of such burial space to witness the disinterment and reinterment.

The cemetery shall bear all costs of the disinterment and reinterment.

History.

1997, c. 74.

§ 57-27.3.
Authorization for interment.

A cemetery may accept the notarized signature of one next of kin of a decedent for the purpose of authorizing the interment or entombment, and for erecting a memorial on the grave, crypt or niche, unless the cemetery is on written notice that there exists a dispute between next of kin over such interment, entombment or memorialization. In the case of such a dispute, the cemetery shall have no obligation to perform the interment, entombment or memorialization until there is agreement of all next of kin, or a court order adjudicating the issue among all necessary parties.

For purposes of this section, “next of kin” means any of the following persons, regardless of the relationship to the decedent: any person designated to make arrangements for the disposition of the decedent’s remains upon his death pursuant to §

54.1-2825

, the legal spouse, child over 18 years of age, custodial parent, noncustodial parent, siblings over 18 years of age, guardian of minor child, guardian of minor siblings, maternal grandparents, paternal grandparents, maternal siblings over 18 years of age and paternal siblings over 18 years of age, or any other relative in the descending order of blood relationship.

History.

2004, c. 247.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of the law of wills, trusts and estates, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 447 (2004).